Maine, session 132, LD1305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1413 is enacted to read:
§1413. Temporary license; forestry worker or migrant and seasonal farm worker
1. Transportation; forestry worker or migrant and seasonal farm worker. For
the purpose of driving workers between workers' lodging and work sites each day at no
cost to the workers as provided in Title 26, section 643, subsection 1, the Secretary of State
may issue a temporary license to an applicant who:
A. Provides documentary evidence that the applicant meets driver qualifications under
Title 26, section 643, subsection 1, paragraph B; and
B. Possesses a valid or recently expired driver's license from the operator's home
country.
The temporary license issued pursuant to this subsection is considered a Class B license
under Title 29-A, section 1252 and is valid only for the purposes described in this
subsection.
2. "Worker" defined. For purposes of this section, "worker" has the same meaning
as in Title 26, section 642, subsection 6.